Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.415.400

Reading instruction and early literacy—Professional development.

(1) High quality professional development is essential for educators to keep abreast of the important advances in research that are occurring regarding instructional strategies and curriculum. Professional development in early literacy is especially important to support the instruction of young readers since reading proficiency is a crucial element for student academic success.

(2) Subject to funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall create partnerships with the educational service districts and public or private institutions of higher education with approved educator preparation programs to develop and deliver research-based professional development learning opportunities in reading instruction and early literacy for teachers of kindergarten through fourth grade students.

[ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 103.]

NOTES:

Application—Enforcement of laws protecting health and safety—2013 2nd sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28A.600.022.